src/import/liitsonamask.lexc
LEXICON Arvsõnad
 < Arvsõna > GI;

 ! fixme: teistkümned, kümned, sajad

 < Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+nom" "&" "-" "&" Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+nom" > GI; ! üht-teist, viies-kuues jm
 < Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+gen" "&" "-" "&" Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+gen" > GI;
 < Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+part" "&" "-" "&" Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+part" > GI;
 < Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+adit" "&" "-" "&" Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+adit" > GI;
 < Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+ill" "&" "-" "&" Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+ill" > GI;
 < Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+in" "&" "-" "&" Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+in" > GI;
 < Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+el" "&" "-" "&" Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+el" > GI;
 < Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+all" "&" "-" "&" Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+all" > GI;
 < Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+ad" "&" "-" "&" Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+ad" > GI;
 < Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+abl" "&" "-" "&" Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+abl" > GI;
 < Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+tr" "&" "-" "&" Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+tr" > GI;
 < Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+gen" "&" "-" "&" Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+term" > GI;
 < Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+gen" "&" "-" "&" Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+es" > GI;
 < Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+gen" "&" "-" "&" Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+abes" > GI;
 < Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+gen" "&" "-" "&" Tähtsõne [ "+Num" | "+Ord" ] "+sg" "+kom" > GI;

LEXICON Omadussõnad
 < Omadussõna > GI;
 < Omadussõna' ("+sg" "+nom") SP > Tegusõnad; ! EKKR, SM19
 < Omadussõna' ("+sg" "+nom" | "+prefix") SP > Nimisõnad; ! EKKR, SM27 ! FIXME: lühitüved
 < Omadussõna' ("+sg" "+nom" | "+prefix") SP > Omadussõnad; ! EKKR, SM38 ! FIXME: lühitüved
 < Omadussõna' ("+sg" "+nom" | "+prefix") SP > Määrsõnad; ! EKKR, SM42 ! FIXME: lühitüved
 < Omadussõna' ("+sg" "+nom" | "+prefix") Kriips > #;


LEXICON Määrsõnad
 < Määrsõna > GI;
 < Määrsõna SP > Tegusõnad; ! EKKR, SM19
 < Määrsõna ("+prefix") SP > Nimisõnad; ! EKKR, SM31
 < Määrsõna ("+prefix") SP > Omadussõnad; ! EKKR, SM39

 < Määrsõna ("+prefix") SP > Määrsõnad; ! EKKR, SM42
 < Määrsõna ("+prefix") SP Määrsõna "+suffix" > GI;


LEXICON Kaassõnad
 < Kaassõna > GI;
 < Kaassõna SP > Käänduvad_sõnad; ! EKKR, SM42 ?

LEXICON Asesõnad
 < Asesõna > GI;


LEXICON Käänduvad_sõnad
 Nimisõnad;
 Omadussõnad;
 Arvsõnad;
 Asesõnad;

LEXICON Muutumatud_sõnad
 Määrsõnad;
 Kaassõnad;
 < Hüüdsõna | Sidesõna | Muusõna | Genatribuut > GI;


LEXICON GI
< Gi > #;
